Hawaii statutes.
§417E-6 Administration, rules and orders.
(a) [Effective July 1, 2008, "chapter 485" changed to
"chapter 485A". L 2006, c 229, §11.] In administering this
chapter, the commissioner may exercise all powers granted to the commissioner
under chapter 485, which are not inconsistent with this chapter.

(b) The commissioner may make and adopt such
rules and forms as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter
including, without limitation, rules defining terms used in this chapter.

(c) The commissioner, by rule or order, may
exempt from any provisions of this chapter any proposed take-over offer or any
category or type of take-over offer which the commissioner determines does not
have the purpose or effect of changing or influencing the control of a target
company or where the commissioner determines that compliance with this chapter
is not necessary for the protection of the offerees, and the commissioner may
similarly exempt any persons from the requirement of filing statements under
this chapter. [L 1985, c 32, pt of §2]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next